Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Chapter 4 Alternative Forms of Government

Cross references. —

For general provisions as to cities and towns, see §§

15-1-101

to

15-1-1103

.

For provision prohibiting the legislature from delegating power to perform municipal functions, see art. 3, § 37, Wyo. Const.

For provision that no person except a qualified elector shall be elected or appointed to any civil or military office in the state, see art. 6, § 15, Wyo. Const.

As to suspension of officers of municipalities, see art. 6, § 16, Wyo. Const.

For constitutional provisions as to municipal corporations generally, see art. 13, §§ 1 to 5, Wyo. Const.

As to consolidation of offices and municipalities, see art. 14, § 6, Wyo. Const.

For provision limiting city tax levy, see art. 15, § 6, Wyo. Const.

For provision that the power of taxation shall never be surrendered or suspended by any grant or contract to which the state or any municipal corporation shall be a party, see art. 15, § 14, Wyo. Const.

As to creation of municipal debt in excess of taxes for current year, see art. 16, § 4, Wyo. Const.

As to limitation on municipal debt, see art. 16, § 5, Wyo. Const.

For provisions relative to municipal courts applicable to all incorporated cities or towns in the state, see §§

5-6-101

to

5-6-110

.

As to joint city and county buildings, see §

18-2-104

.

For authority of governing body of cities, towns, counties and school districts to establish and maintain recreational facilities and playgrounds, see §§

18-9-201

and

18-9-202

.

As to municipal elections generally, see §§

22-23-101

to

22-23-1007

.

For provisions relating to the procedure for changing the form of government, see §§

15-11-301

and

15-11-302

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

62 C.J.S. Municipal Corporations § 208 et seq.